South Dakota, session 2026, HB1005.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
The terms used in this Act mean:
(1) "Computer software," programs and other operating information used solely for
the maintenance and operation of a qualified data center;
(2) "Data center," a centralized repository for the storage, management,
dissemination, and processing of electronic data and information, except for that
which relates to the mining of digital currency;
(3) "Enterprise information technology equipment," the following products used solely
for the maintenance and operation of a qualified data center:
(a) Computer hardware, servers, storage arrays, backup systems, disaster
recovery equipment, routers, cooling systems, temperature control
infrastructure, network equipment, switches, load balancers, firewalls,
network cabling, edge devices, network monitoring equipment, water
treatment systems, chilled water equipment, economizers, cooling towers,
and piping and pump equipment for cooling towers;
(b) Power infrastructure for the management of electricity, dedicated
distribution equipment, backup power generation systems, battery
systems, construction materials for structures unique to data centers or
other related infrastructure excluding primary electric generation service,
transmission, or utility distribution infrastructure;
(c) Racking systems, raised flooring, cabling, or trays necessary for the
maintenance and operation of a qualified data center;
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.31.38 2 1005
(d) Security systems, physical access control systems, surveillance systems,
biometric scanners, security monitoring equipment, and monitoring
systems, environmental monitoring systems, infrastructure management
tools, and building management systems;
(e) Testing and diagnostic equipment used for maintenance, commissioning, or
troubleshooting;
(f) Telecommunications and fiber infrastructure, fiber optic cabling, satellite
equipment, and internet exchange components; and
(g) Air quality systems, specialized HVAC, filtration, and humidity control
equipment;
(4) "Qualified business," the owner, operator, or tenant of a qualified data center or a
proposed data center;
(5) "Qualified data center," a facility located in this state:
(a) Comprised of one or more buildings containing a data center;
(b) Where all buildings that contain a data center qualify as real property
subject to taxation pursuant to §§ 10-4-1 and 10-4-2;
(c) Where the qualifying date occurs on or after July 1, 2026, and on or before
June 30, 2036; and
(d) Equipped with fire suppression and prevention systems; and
(6) "Qualifying date," the date on which a building permit is issued for the initial
construction of the facility.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
There are specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter and from the
computation of tax imposed by it, gross receipts from the sale of enterprise information
technology equipment or computer software to be used in a qualified data center. A
qualified business is exempt for a period of fifty years after the qualifying date.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-45:
To be eligible for the exemption provided in section 2 of this Act, a qualified
business in a qualified data center, or a qualified business in a proposed qualified data
center, shall submit any documentary evidence required by the Department of Revenue
to verify the eligibility of the qualified data center or proposed data center. The
documentary evidence required by this section is confidential. The secretary of the
Department of Revenue shall determine if the qualified business is eligible.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.31.38 3 1005
To be eligible for the exemption provided by section 2 of this Act, a qualified
business shall:
(1) Ensure electric service provided to the qualified business by an electric utility is
under a written agreement or rate schedule that avoids the shifting of costs to
other customers of the electric utility; and
(2) Provide notice to local water providers to ensure that water consumption is
compatible for the location in which the qualified data center is situated.
Upon determining the eligibility of a future qualified business in a proposed
qualified data center, the secretary shall provide an exemption certificate for taxes
imposed pursuant to this chapter and chapter 10-46.
To retain eligibility for the exemption provided in section 2 of this Act, a qualified
business must file an affidavit with the secretary attesting that the data center or the
future data center qualifies for the exemption provided in section 2 of this Act, prior to
June first of each year.
Section 4. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 10-46:
There are specifically exempted from the provisions of this chapter, gross receipts
from the sale of enterprise information technology equipment or computer software to be
used in a qualified data center. A qualified business is exempt for a period of fifty years
after the qualifying date.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.